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Skid Control ECUDeceleration Sensor
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DI−258 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1244 / 44 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This sensor detects deceleration on the vehicle. The sensor signal is used in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC con-
trol. If the sensor functions abnormally, the ABS warning light comes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1244 / 44

Either of the following 1., 2., 3. or 4. is detected:
1. The condition that ECU terminals GL1 and GL2 values are

−1.5Gor lessor1.5Gormorecontinues for1.2sec.or
more.

2. The condition that the deceleration sensor terminal VGS
voltage is 4.4 V or less or 5.6 V or more continues for 1.2
sec. or more.

3.At thevehiclespeedof0km/h (0mph),after thedifference
of output value between deceleration sensor terminals GL1
and GL2 becomes 0.6 G or more, and the condition that
does not become 0.4 G or less continues for 60 sec. or
more.

4. Deceleration sensor signal momentary open occurs for 7
times or more.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

2 Check deceleration sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b)ConnectVYSterminal to thebatteries’positive (+) termi-

nal,andGYAWterminal to thebatteries’negative ( −) ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-
nals.

NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and
GYAW.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the
sensor is tilted forward and rearward.
OK:

Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL1 Leanrearward 1.0V − about2.3V

GL1 Lean forward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL2 Leanrearward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Lean forward 1.0V − about2.3V

HINT:
S If thesensor is tilted toomuch itmayshowthewrongval-

ue.
S If dropped, thesensorshouldbe replacedwithanewone.
S The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be

placed upside down.

NG Replace deceleration sensor.

OK
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Check and replace skid control ECU.


